Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2702
Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska; powers and duties.

(1)(a) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations setting forth codes for the official testing of tractors.

(b) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall adopt procedures for the official testing of agricultural tractors as prescribed by the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development.

(c) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall also adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the testing of tractors as published by the Society of Automotive Engineers and the American Society of Agricultural Engineers.

(2) In addition to the powers and duties prescribed in sections 2-2701 to 2-2711, the University of Nebraska shall have the power to:

(a) Authorize the use of the Nebraska Tractor Testing Laboratory facilities to conduct Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development testing;

(b) Cooperate with the United States Department of Commerce when planning and conducting Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development testing;

(c) Conduct offsite tractor tests; and

(d) Submit and certify tractor test results to the federal government.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 37, p. 1395;

R.R.S.1943, § 75-337;

Laws 1967, c. 480, § 2, p. 1487;

Laws 1971, LB 692, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 768, § 4.